Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6333.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Advertisement" means a communication, message, or promotional material, whether oral, written, printed, digital, broadcast, or otherwise disseminated, that is intended to influence public perception of, or draw attention to, a person, product, service, program, policy, event, or cause. (b) "Governmental entity" means this state or a political subdivision of this state. Sec. 3. (1) If an advertisement includes a placement, sponsorship, endorsement, or distribution that is paid for, subsidized, or otherwise provided in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, by a governmental entity, the advertisement must include the following statement: "Paid for by taxpayers.". (2) A person that disseminates an advertisement in violation of subsection (1) is subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine.